Maryland, session 2025, HB1169.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1169*

HOUSE BILL 1169
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), and (f) of this section, each public
school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day; and
(3) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to meet
the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(c) (1) The following days are public school holidays:
(i) Thanksgiving Day and the day after;
(ii) Christmas Eve and from then through January 1;
(iii) Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;
(iv) Presidents’ Day;
(v) The Friday before Easter and from then through the Monday
after Easter;
(vi) Memorial Day; and
(vii) Primary and general election days.
(2) If the federal and State observances of a holiday are on different days,
the board of education of each county shall determine which date shall be the date of
observance for the public schools within the county.
(3) The public schools shall devote a part of at least one day to appropriate
exercises for each of the following:
(i) Washington’s Birthday;

HOUSE BILL 1169 3
(ii) Lincoln’s Birthday;
(iii) Veterans’ Day;
(iv) Columbus Day;
(v) Arbor Day;
(vi) Black History Month, with an emphasis on Harriet Tubman and
Frederick Douglass and the contributions they made in the fight against slavery; and
(vii) Any other day of national significance.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the public schools,
in the following counties, may remain open and in session on primary and general election
days:
(i) Calvert;
(ii) Caroline;
(iii) Dorchester;
(iv) Kent;
(v) Talbot; and
(vi) Worcester.
(5) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN HOWARD AND
MONTGOMERY COUNTY COUNTIES.
(II) THE BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, THE
HOWARD COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY BOARD
OF EDUCATION SHALL CLOSE PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY, INCLUDING ALL
BUILDINGS AND OFFICES, FOR STUDENT ATTENDANCE ONLY TO OBSERVE THE
FOLLOWING HOLIDAYS:
1. IF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING HOLIDAYS BEGIN ON A
WEEKDAY, THE THE FIRST DAY ONLY OF:
A. DIWALI;
B. EID AL–ADHA;

HOUSE BILL 1169
C. EID AL–FITR;
D. LUNAR NEW YEAR; AND
E. ROSH HASHANAH; AND
2. YOM KIPPUR; AND
3. JUNETEENTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.